Mississippi, session 20251E, SB2007.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is hereby appropriated out of any funds in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, to the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning to be used for the operation of the College of Veterinary Medicine at Mississippi State University, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026.... $ 20,566,652.00. SECTION 2.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is hereby authorized for expenditure out of any special source funds which are collected by or otherwise become available for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the College of Veterinary Medicine at Mississippi State University, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026.......................... ............................................ $ 52,903,069.00. SECTION 3.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 2 of this act, Seven Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($750,000.00) shall be derived from the Education Enhancement Fund from funds deposited pursuant to Sections 27-65-75 and 27-67-31, Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 4.  No general funds authorized to be expended herein shall be used to replace federal funds and/or other special funds which are being used for salaries authorized under the provisions of this act and which are withdrawn and no longer available. SECTION 5.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the agency's budget request for Fiscal Year 2027 shall be submitted to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee in a format and level of detail comparable to the format and level of detail provided during the Fiscal Year 2026 budget request process. SECTION 6.  In compliance with the "Mississippi Performance Budget and Strategic Planning Act of 1994," it is the intent of the Legislature that the funds provided herein shall be utilized in the most efficient and effective manner possible to achieve the intended mission of this agency.  Based on the funding authorized, this agency shall make every effort to attain the targeted performance measures provided below: FY2026 Performance Measures                                       Target Instruction Percent of Year 4 DVM Students Passing NAVLE at Graduation                               95.00 Percent of DVM Graduates Reporting Employment in the Field within 12 Months of Graduation                                     95.00 Research Number of Grants/Contracts Awarded                        55 Percent of Graduate Students Reporting Employment in the Field within 12 months of Graduation                                     95.00 Pub-service - Animal Health Ctr Number of Patient Visits to AHC (AHC Caseload Managed)                                40,000 Percent of Client Satisfaction Based on Surveys                                          98.00 Percent of Referring Veterinarian Satisfaction Based on Surveys                     95.00 Pub-service - Diagnostic Lab Number of Lab Accessions (Test Requests)               31,500 Vet Research & Diagnostic Lab Number of Diagnostic Tests Performed                 345,000 Academic Support Percent of Vet Campers & Parents Indicating "Willing to Recommend" on Satisfaction Surveys                              98.00 Percent of Vet Campers & Parents Indicating "Willing to Recommend" on Satisfaction Surveys                              98.00 Operation & Maintenance Number of Square Feet O&M/Custodial Services          500,237 Cost per Square Foot Maintenance & Custodial Services                                10.00 A reporting of the degree to which the performance targets set above have been or are being achieved shall be provided in the agency's budget request submitted to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee for Fiscal Year 2027. SECTION 7.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 1 of this act, the amount of One Hundred Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($125,000.00) shall be used for the purpose of testing, programming, and personnel-related expenses for Chronic Waste Disease. SECTION 8.  It is the intention of the Legislature that whenever two (2) or more bids are received by this agency for the purchase of commodities or equipment, and whenever all things stated in such received bids are equal with respect to price, quality and service, the Mississippi Industries for the Blind shall be given preference.  A similar preference shall be given to the Mississippi Industries for the Blind whenever purchases are made without competitive bids. SECTION 9.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the funds herein appropriated shall be expended in compliance with Section 27-104-25, Mississippi Code of 1972, that no state agency shall incur obligations or indebtedness in excess of their appropriation and that the responsible officers, either personally or upon their official bonds, shall be held responsible for actions contrary to this provision. SECTION 10.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 1 of this act, One Hundred Twenty Thousand Dollars ($120,000.00) is hereby provided for scholarships for the Dr. Elton Mac Huddleston Rural Veterinarians Scholarship Program as prescribed in Section 37-113-71, Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 11.  Of the funds in Section 2 of this act, Seventeen Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($17,500,000.00) is provided from the Mississippi State University Veterinary School Fund as created in Section 37-113-55, Mississippi Code of 1972, for the purpose of paying costs associated with the design, construction, renovation, repairs, and equipping of the Wise Center. SECTION 12.  The money herein appropriated shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the proper fund or funds as set forth in this act, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 13.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2025.